Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.230

Effective time and date of document.

A document filed with the secretary of state is effective as provided in RCW 23.95.210, and may state a delayed effective date and time in accordance with RCW 23.95.210.

[ 2020 c 57 s 35; 2015 c 176 s 2103; 2002 c 297 s 4; 1989 c 165 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.